Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA; WASHINGTON AVENUE PEDESTRIAN BRIDGE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to be spent in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 135A.046. This appropriation is to design and construct the replacement of the pedestrian enclosure and suicide deterrent barriers on the Washington Avenue Pedestrian Bridge on the Twin Cities campus. The board must consult with persons impacted by suicide at this bridge, suicide prevention organizations, and experts in the field of suicide prevention in designing the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $15,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end